Indiana, session 2026, HB1341.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-39-1-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 3. Because:
(1) the movement of carbon dioxide conducted for:
(A) a person's own use or account; or
(B) the use or account of another person or persons;
by pipeline in Indiana for carbon management applications can
assist efforts to reduce carbon dioxide emissions; and
(2) the underground storage of carbon dioxide can assist efforts
to reduce carbon dioxide emissions;
the use of carbon dioxide transmission pipelines, including their
routing, construction, maintenance, and operation, and the underground
storage of carbon dioxide are declared as a matter of legislative
determination to be a public use and service, in the public interest, and
a benefit to the welfare and people of Indiana.
SECTION 2. IC 14-39-1-3.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. Notwithstanding any other law:
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


(1) A person may not exercise eminent domain to acquire
right-of-way for the construction or operation of a pipeline
for the preponderant purpose of transporting carbon dioxide
or other carbon oxides.
(2) A person may not exercise eminent domain to acquire
right-of-way or obtain the property rights or ownership of
underground strata or formations located under the surface
of the property for purposes of establishing and operating a
Class VI injection well or monitoring facilities required by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for the
underground storage of carbon dioxide or other carbon
oxides.
(3) A person may not exercise eminent domain for:
(A) a carbon sequestration pilot project under section 3.5
of this chapter; or
(B) another underground carbon dioxide (or other carbon
oxides) storage project.
SECTION 3. IC 14-39-1-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.150-2011,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. A certificate of authority issued by the
department under this chapter must include at least the following:
(1) A grant of authority to construct and operate a carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline as requested in the application.
(2) A grant of authority to use, occupy, and construct pipeline
facilities in any designated public right-of-way for the
construction and operation of the carbon dioxide transmission
pipeline.
(3) A grant of authority to take and acquire possession by eminent
domain of any property or interest in property for the
construction, maintenance, or operation of a carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline in the manner provided for the exercise of
the power of eminent domain under sections 7, 8, and 9 of this
chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 14-39-1-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 7. (a) If a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline company
has received a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline certificate of
authority from the department under this chapter and is not able to
reach an agreement with a property owner for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of the carbon dioxide transmission pipeline
on the owner's property, the company may proceed to condemn a
right-of-way or an easement necessary or useful for:
(1) constructing, maintaining, using, operating, and gaining
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


access to a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline and all necessary
machinery, equipment, pumping stations, appliances, and fixtures
for use in connection with the carbon dioxide transmission
pipeline; and
(2) obtaining all necessary rights of ingress and egress to
construct, examine, alter, repair, maintain, operate, or remove a
carbon dioxide transmission pipeline and all of its component
parts.
(b) If the operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project is not
able to reach an agreement with an owner of property to acquire:
(1) ownership of underground strata or formations located under
the surface of the property for purposes of the underground
storage of carbon dioxide; or
(2) ownership or other rights to one (1) or more areas of the
surface of the property for purposes of establishing and operating
monitoring facilities required by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency for the underground storage of carbon dioxide;
that are needed for the carbon sequestration pilot project, the operator
of the carbon sequestration pilot project may exercise the power of
eminent domain under IC 32-24-1 and IC 32-24-5 to make the needed
acquisition.
SECTION 5. IC 14-39-1-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
IC 32-24-1 applies to the condemnation of property under section 7(a)
of this chapter by a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline company.
(b) IC 32-24-5 and (pursuant to IC 32-24-5-5) IC 32-24-1 apply to
the condemnation of property under section 7(b) of this chapter by the
operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project, strictly for purposes
of the carbon sequestration pilot project.
SECTION 6. IC 14-39-1-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. A carbon dioxide transmission pipeline company that
exercises the authority set forth in section 7(a) of this chapter shall:
(1) compensate the property owner by making a payment to the
owner equal to:
(A) one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the fair market
value of the interest in the property acquired, if the
right-of-way or easement involves agricultural land; or
(B) one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fair market value
of the interest in the property acquired, if the right-of-way or
easement involves a parcel of property occupied by the owner
as a residence; and
(2) pay to the property owner:
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


(A) any damages determined under IC 32-24-1; and
(B) any loss incurred in a trade or business;
that are attributable to the exercise of eminent domain.
SECTION 7. IC 32-24-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Whereas, the storage of gas in subsurface
strata or formations of the earth in Indiana tends to insure a more
adequate supply of gas to domestic, commercial, and industrial
consumers of gas in this state and materially promotes the economy of
the state, the storage of gas is declared to be in public interest and for
the welfare of Indiana and the people of Indiana and to be a public use.
(b) Whereas, because the underground storage of carbon dioxide in
subsurface strata or formations of the earth can assist efforts to reduce
carbon dioxide emissions and thus materially promotes the well-being
of citizens of the state, the underground storage of carbon dioxide is
declared to be:
(1) in the public interest and for the welfare of Indiana and the
people of Indiana; and
(2) a public use.
SECTION 8. IC 32-24-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person, firm, limited liability company,
municipal corporation, or other corporation authorized to do business
in Indiana and engaged in the business of transporting or distributing
gas by means of pipelines into, within, or through Indiana for ultimate
public use may condemn:
(1) land subsurface strata or formations;
(2) other necessary land rights;
(3) land improvements and fixtures, in or on land, except
buildings of any nature; and
(4) the use and occupation of land subsurface strata or formations;
for constructing, maintaining, drilling, utilizing, and operating an
underground gas storage reservoir.
(b) The operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project established
under IC 14-39-1 may exercise the power of eminent domain to obtain:
(1) ownership of such underground strata and formations located
under the surface of the owner's property as may be necessary or
useful for underground storage of carbon dioxide in the strata or
formations; and
(2) ownership or other rights to one (1) or more areas of the
surface of the owner's property, including but not limited to one
(1) or more rights-of-way or easements, as may be necessary or
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


useful for constructing, maintaining, using, operating, and gaining
access to monitoring facilities required by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency for the underground storage of
carbon dioxide.
(c) (b) The following rights in land may be condemned for use in
connection with the underground storage of gas:
(1) To drill and operate wells in and on land.
(2) To install and operate pipelines.
(3) To install and operate equipment, machinery, fixtures, and
communication facilities.
(4) To create ingress and egress to explore and examine
subsurface strata or underground formations.
(5) To create ingress and egress to construct, alter, repair,
maintain, and operate an underground storage reservoir.
(6) To exclusively use any subsurface strata condemned.
(7) To remove and reinstall pipe and other equipment used in
connection with rights condemned under subdivisions (1) through
(6).
(d) (c) Acquisition of subsurface rights in land for gas storage
purposes or for purposes of the carbon sequestration pilot project
established under IC 14-39-1 by condemnation under this section must
be without prejudice to any subsequent proceedings that may be
necessary under this section to acquire additional subsurface rights in
the same land for use in connection with the underground storage.
Surface rights in land necessary for the accomplishment of the
purposes set forth in this section may be condemned.
(e) (d) Except with respect to a proceeding under this chapter to:
(1) acquire the right to explore and examine a subsurface stratum
or formation in land; and
(2) create the right of ingress and egress for operations connected
to the acquisition;
and subject to subsection (f), (e), as a condition precedent to the
exercise of the right to condemn any underground stratum, formation,
or interest reasonably expected to be used or useful for underground
gas storage, or for purposes of the carbon sequestration pilot project
established under IC 14-39-1, a condemnor first must have acquired by
purchase, option, lease, or other method not involving condemnation,
the right, or right upon the exercise of an option, if any, to store gas in
at least sixty per cent (60%) of the stratum or formation. This must be
computed in relation to the total surface acreage overlying the entire
stratum or formation considered useful for the purpose.
(f) (e) A tract under which the stratum or formation sought to be
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


condemned is owned by two (2) or more persons, firms, limited
liability companies, or corporations must be credited to the condemnor
as acquired by it for the purpose of computing the percentage of
acreage acquired by the condemnor in complying with the requirement
of subsection (e) (d) if the condemnor acquires from the owner or
owners of an undivided three-fourths (3/4) part or interest or more of
the underground stratum or formation, by purchase, option, lease, or
other method not involving condemnation, the right, or right upon the
exercise of an option, if any, to store gas in the stratum or formation. It
is not necessary for the condemnor to have acquired any interest in the
property in which the condemnee has an interest before instituting a
proceeding under this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 32-24-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The rights acquired by condemnation under
this chapter must be without prejudice to the rights and interests of the
owners or their lessees to:
(1) execute oil and gas leases;
(2) drill or bore to any other strata or formation not condemned;
and
(3) produce oil and gas discovered.
However, any drilling and all operations in connection with the drilling
must be performed in a manner that protects the strata or formations
condemned against the loss of gas and against contamination of the
reservoir by water, oil, or other substance that will affect the use of the
condemned strata or formations for gas storage purposes.
(b) If the owners of mineral rights or the owners' lessees drill into
land in which gas storage rights have been condemned under this
chapter, the owners of mineral rights or their lessees shall give notice
to the owner of the gas storage stratum, formation, or horizon at least
thirty (30) days before commencing the drilling. The notice must
specify the location and nature of the operations, including the depth
to be drilled. The notice must be given by United States registered or
certified mail, return receipt requested, and addressed to the usual
business address of the owner or owners of the gas storage stratum or
formation condemned under this chapter.
(c) It is the duty of the owner of a gas storage stratum or formation
to designate all necessary procedures for protecting the gas storage
area. The actual costs incurred over and above customary and usual
drilling and other costs that would have been incurred without
compliance with the requirements shall be borne by the owner of the
gas storage stratum or formation. An owner or lessee of mineral
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87


interests other than gas storage rights is not responsible for an act done
under such a requirement or the consequences of this act.
SECTION 10. IC 32-24-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. Only the rights in land necessary for use in
connection with (1) the underground storage of gas and those
subsurface strata adaptable for underground storage of gas and (2) the
carbon sequestration pilot project established under IC 14-39-1; may
be appropriated and condemned under this chapter. Rights in the
subsurface of land constituting a part of a geological structure are
deemed necessary to the operation of an underground storage reservoir
in the structure. In determining the compensation to be paid to the
owner of an oil producing stratum, or interest in the stratum,
condemned under this chapter, proof may be offered and consideration
must be given to potential recovery, if any, of oil from a stratum by
secondary or other subsequent recovery processes in addition to
potential recovery by a primary process.
2026 IN 1341—LS 7051/DI 87